Arkansas, session 2025, HB1961.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 9, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-9-106. Temporary exemption from federal information-blocking
regulations — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1)(A) "Information-blocking" means a practice that is likely to
interfere with access, exchange, or use of electronic health information that
is conducted by a medical provider that knows that such a practice is
unreasonable and is likely to interfere with access, exchange, or use of
electronic health information.
(B) "Information-blocking" does not include practices
*JMB100*
04/01/2025 8:02:55 AM JMB100

HB1961
required by law or covered by an exception in 45 C.F.R. Part 171, Subparts B,
C, or D, as existing on January 1, 2025; and
(2) "Medical provider" means an individual licensed, certified,
or otherwise authorized by state law to provide healthcare services in the
ordinary course of business or practice of his or her profession.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a medical
provider may temporarily withhold a patient's medical records from being
released directly to the patient or any individual authorized by the patient
to receive their medical records for up to thirty (30) days if the medical
provider:
(1) Reasonably believes that immediate disclosure of the medical
records may lead to the patient's misinterpreting the information in a manner
that could adversely affect the patient's health or safety or otherwise
negatively affect the patient's mental or physical health;
(2) Requires sufficient time to review the results or
information contained in the medical records to prepare a plan of treatment
for the patient; and
(3) Schedules, or makes a good faith effort to schedule, a
timely discussion with the patient to explain and interpret the medical
records.
(c) The temporary withholding of medical records under subsection (b)
of this section shall:
(1) Be limited to the minimum period necessary for the medical
provider to review the records and arrange a discussion with the patient
under subdivision (b)(3) of this section;
(2) Not extend beyond a reasonable time required for such
purposes; and
(3) Cease immediately after the discussion with the patient in
subdivision (b)(3) of this section has occurred or release of information is
determined to no longer be a risk to the patient’s health or safety.
(d) Upon completion of the discussion referenced in subdivision (b)(3)
of this section, all applicable federal information-blocking laws and
regulations and all state information-blocking laws and rules shall apply,
and the medical records shall be released promptly and in full compliance
with all laws, regulations, and rules.
(e) This section does not:
04/01/2025 8:02:55 AM JMB100

HB1961
(1) Allow a medical provider to withhold medical records from a
patient beyond the temporary period described in subsection (c) of this
section;
(2) Exempt a medical provider from complying with any other
applicable federal or state laws and regulations governing the release of
medical records;
(3) Create a cause of action against a medical provider who, in
good faith, exercises the provisions of this section; or
(4) Prohibit release of medical records under § 16-46-106.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 16-46-106(e)(1), concerning access to
medical records for legal proceedings, is amended to read as follows:
(e)(1) If a doctor believes a patient should be denied access to his
or her medical records for any reason, the doctor must provide the patient or
the patient's guardian or attorney a written determination that disclosure of
such information would be detrimental to the individual's health or well-
being and comply with § 20-9-106.

SECTION 3. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that ensuring patients receive
accurate and comprehensible medical information is critical to their health
and safety; that medical providers need reasonable time to interpret and
explain complex medical results to patients to prevent misunderstanding; and
that this act is necessary because medical providers should be allowed to
temporarily withhold medical records in order to safeguard patients during
the information disclosure process. Therefore, an emergency is declared to
exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace,
health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2025.








04/01/2025 8:02:55 AM JMB100